Tennessee, session 114, HB0898.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 7, Chapter 82, Part 7, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Each utility system shall obtain a certificate of analysis for any water sold by the
utility system that contains fluoride. The certificate of analysis and the material safety
data sheet for fluoride must be posted to the utility system's website, or to the board of
utility regulation's website if the utility system does not have a website.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0898
001464
- 1 -